Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 13 Limited Partnerships [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]
7-13-49.
Registration. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited partnership shall register with the secretary of state. In order to register, a foreign limited partnership shall submit to the secretary of state, in duplicate, an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, signed and sworn to by a general partner and setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which it proposes to register and transact business in this state;

The state and date of its formation;

The general character of the business it proposes to transact in this state;

The name and address of any agent for service of process on the foreign limited partnership whom the foreign limited partnership elects to appoint; the agent must be an individual resident of this state, a domestic corporation, or a foreign corporation having a place of business in, and authorized to do business in this state;

A statement that the secretary of state is appointed the agent of the foreign limited partnership for service of process if no agent has been appointed under subdivision (4) or, if appointed, the agent’s authority has been revoked or if the agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence;

The address of the office required to be maintained in the state of its organization by the laws of that state or, if not so required, of the principal office of the foreign limited partnership;

The name and business address of each general partner;

The address of the office at which is kept a list of the names and addresses of the limited partners and their capital contributions, together with an undertaking by the foreign limited partnership to keep those records until the foreign limited partnership’s registration in this state is canceled or withdrawn;

A mailing address for the foreign limited partnership; and

Additional information as may be necessary or appropriate in order to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the foreign limited partnership is entitled to a certificate of authority to transact business in this state and to determine and assess the fees payable as prescribed in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4.

7-13-49.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-50.
Issuance of registration. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If the secretary of state finds that an application for registration of a foreign limited partnership conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, he or she shall:

Endorse on the application the word “Filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing of the application;

File in his or her office the original of the application; and

Issue a certificate of registration to transact business in this state.

The certificate of registration, together with a duplicate original of the application, shall be returned to the person who filed the application or his or her representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8.

7-13-50.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-51.
Name of foreign limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited partnership may register with the secretary of state under any name, whether or not it is the name under which it is registered in its state of organization, that includes either:

without abbreviation the words “limited partnership” or

the letters and punctuation “L.P.”, and that could be registered by a domestic limited partnership, and

Shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of any corporation, non-business corporation or other association, domestic or foreign limited-liability company, limited partnership organized under the laws of, or registered or qualified to do business in this state or any name that is filed, reserved, or registered under this title or as permitted by the laws of this state, subject to the following:

This provision does not apply if the applicant files with the secretary of state a certified copy of a final decree of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state; and

The name may be the same as the name of a corporation, non-business corporation or other association the certificate of incorporation or organization of which has been revoked by the secretary of state as permitted by law, and the revocation has not been withdrawn within one year from the date of the revocation.

Words and/or abbreviations that are required by statute to identify the particular type of business entity shall be disregarded when determining if a name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations defining the term “distinguishable upon the record” for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 4.

7-13-51.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 54, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 60, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-52.
Changes and amendments. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file in the office of the secretary of state a certificate, signed and sworn to by a general partner, correcting the statement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-52.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-52.1.
Foreign application for transfer of authority. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A duly authorized foreign limited partnership in the state of Rhode Island that converts into any form of foreign or other entity subject to the provisions of Title 7 and the resulting entity is required to file for authority to transact business in this state may apply for a transfer of authority in the office of the secretary of state by filing:

An application for transfer of authority that has been executed and filed in accordance with §

7-13-11

;

An application for authority to transact business in the state of Rhode Island for the resulting entity type; and

A certificate of legal existence or good standing issued by the proper officer of the state or country under the laws of which the resulting entity has been formed.

The application for transfer of authority shall state:

The name of the limited partnership;

The type of other entity into which it has been converted; and

The jurisdiction whose laws govern its internal affairs.

Upon the effective time and date of the application for transfer of authority, the authority of the limited partnership authorized to transact business under this chapter shall be transferred without interruption to the other entity which shall thereafter hold such authority subject to the provisions of the laws of the state of Rhode Island applicable to that type of resulting entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 68, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 85, § 2.

7-13-52.1.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 68, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 85, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-53.
Cancellation of registration. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When all fees and taxes have been paid to the tax administrator, as evidenced by an appropriate certificate of good standing issued by the Rhode Island division of taxation, a foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation signed and sworn to by a general partner. In filing a certificate of cancellation, the foreign limited partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service of process and consents that service of process in any action, suit or proceeding based upon any cause of action arising in this state during the time the foreign limited partnership was authorized to transact business in this state may subsequently be made on the foreign limited partnership by service on the secretary of state. The certificate of cancellation must include the post office address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process against the foreign limited partnership that is served on the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2.

7-13-53.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 88, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-54.
Transaction of business without registration. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A foreign limited partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state until it has registered in this state.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in this state does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.

A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of having transacted business in this state without registration.

A foreign limited partnership, by transacting business in this state without registration, appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process as to claims for relief or causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

Without excluding other activities that may not constitute transacting business in this state, a foreign limited partnership is not considered to be transacting business in this state for purposes of this chapter by reason of carrying on in this state any one or more of the following activities:

Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration proceeding or effecting a settlement of it or the settlement of any claims or dispute;

Holding meetings of the partners or carrying on other activities concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of partnership securities or partnership interests, or appointing and maintaining depositories with relation to its partnership interests or securities;

Effecting sales to independent contractors;

Soliciting or procuring orders whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise where the orders require acceptance without this state before becoming binding contracts;

Creating evidences of debt, mortgages, or liens on real or personal property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights and property securing the debts;

Transacting any business in interstate commerce.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-54.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-54.1.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing a certificate of limited partnership, one hundred dollars ($100).

Filing a certificate of amendment to a certificate of limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00).

Filing a certificate of cancellation of a certificate of limited partnership, ten dollars ($10.00).

Filing an application to reserve a limited partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00) and for renewal, seventy-five dollars ($75.00).

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved limited partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00).

Filing a statement of change of address of specified office or change of specified agent, twenty dollars ($20.00).

Filing a statement of change of address only for a specified agent, without fee.

Filing an application of a foreign limited partnership to register as a foreign limited partnership, one hundred dollars ($100).

Filing a certificate of correction of a registration as a foreign limited partnership, ten dollars ($10.00).

Filing a certificate of cancellation of registration as a foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Filing any other document, statement or report of a domestic or foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00).

Filing a certificate of amendment of a foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00).

For issuing a certificate of good standing/letter of status, twenty dollars ($20.00).

For issuing a certificate of fact, thirty dollars ($30.00).

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument or paper relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership, a fee of fifteen cents ($.15) per page and ten dollars ($10.00) for the certificate and affirming the seal to it.

Service of process on the secretary of state as registered agent of a limited partnership, fifteen dollars ($15.00) which amount may be recovered as a taxable cost by the party to the suit or action making the service if the party prevails in the suit or action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 43, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 1.

7-13-54.1.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 43, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 26, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 268, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 109, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-55.
Action to enjoin foreign limited partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The superior court has jurisdiction to enjoin any foreign limited partnership, or any agent of a foreign limited partnership, from transacting any business in the state if the limited partnership has failed to comply with any section of this chapter applicable to it or if the limited partnership has secured a certificate of the secretary of state under §

7-13-49

on the basis of false or misleading representation. The attorney general may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 121, § 1.

7-13-55.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 121, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-56.
Right of action. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partner may bring an action in the right of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-56.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-57.
Proper plaintiff. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In a derivative action, the plaintiff must be a partner at the time of bringing the action and

at the time of the transaction of which he or she complains, or

his or her status as a partner had developed upon him or her by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person who was a partner at the time of the transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-57.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-58.
Pleading. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure initiation of the action by a general partner or the reasons for not making the effort.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-58.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-59.
Expenses. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and shall direct him or her to remit to the limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-59.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-60.
Construction and application. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law as to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-60.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-61.
Short title. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Limited Partnership Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-61.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-62.
Severability. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-62.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-63.
Rule for cases not provided for in this chapter. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In any case not provided for in this chapter, the provisions of chapter 12 of this title govern.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-63.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-64.
Applications to existing limited partnerships. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The provisions of this chapter apply to all domestic limited partnerships existing on January 1, 1987, to the extent that the partnership agreement of each partnership is not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Unless otherwise agreed to by the partners, nothing in this chapter requires any domestic limited partnership validly existing on January 1, 1987, to comply with the provisions of this chapter in order to preserve or continue its status as a limited partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1.

7-13-64.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 440, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-65.
Effect of repeal of prior acts. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The repeal of any prior statutory provision by this chapter does not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or the continued existence of a limited partnership existing at January 1, 1986, nor is the repeal by this chapter of any prior provision to be construed so as to impair any contract or to affect any right accrued prior to January 1, 1986.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2.

7-13-65.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 390, § 2; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-66.
Indemnification. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Subject to any standards and restrictions that are set forth in its partnership agreement, a limited partnership has the power to indemnify and hold harmless any partner or other person from any claims and demands.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3.

7-13-66.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-67.
Classes and voting. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership agreement may provide for classes or groups of limited partners having any relative rights, powers and duties that the partnership agreement provides, and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided in the partnership agreement of additional classes or groups of limited partners having any relative rights, powers and duties that may from time to time be established, including rights, powers and duties senior to existing classes and groups of limited partners.

A partnership agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the partnership agreement, without the vote or approval of any limited partner or class or group of limited partners, including an action to create under the provisions of the partnership agreement a class or group of partnership interests that was not previously outstanding.

Subject to §

7-13-19

the partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified limited partners or a specified class or group of the limited partners the right to vote separately or with all or any class or group of the limited partners or the general partners, on any matter. Voting by limited partners may be on a per capita, number, financial interest, class, group or any other basis.

A partnership agreement that grants a right to vote may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any limited partners, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter as to the exercise of the right to vote.

Any right or power, including voting rights, granted to limited partners as permitted under §

7-13-19

of this title is deemed to be permitted by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3.

7-13-67.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-68.
Merger and consolidation. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

As used in this section, “other business entity” means a corporation, a business trust or association, a real estate investment trust, a common-law trust, a limited-liability corporation, whether foreign or domestic, or an unincorporated business, including a partnership, whether general or limited, but excluding a domestic limited partnership.

Pursuant to an agreement of merger or consolidation, a domestic limited partnership may merge or consolidate with or into one or more domestic limited partnerships or other business entities formed or organized under the laws of the state of Rhode Island or any other state or the United States or any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction, with any domestic limited partnership or other business entity that the agreement provides being the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity. Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, a merger or consolidation shall be approved by each domestic limited partnership that is to merge or consolidate:

By all general partners; and

By the limited partners or, if there is more than one class or group of limited partners, then by each class or group of limited partners, in either case, by limited partners who own more than fifty percent (50%) of the then current percentage or other interest in the profits of the domestic limited partnership owned by all of the limited partners or by the limited partners in each class or group, as appropriate.

In connection with a merger or consolidation under this section, rights or securities of, or interests in, a limited partnership or other business entity that is not a limited partnership or other business entity that is a constituent party to the merger or consolidation may be exchanged for or converted into cash, property, rights or securities of, or interests in, the surviving or resulting limited partnership or other business entity in the merger or consolidation. Despite prior approval, an agreement of merger or consolidation may be terminated or amended pursuant to a provision for termination or amendment contained in the agreement of merger or consolidation.

If a domestic limited partnership is merging or consolidating under this section, the domestic limited partnership or other business entity surviving or resulting in or from the merger or consolidation shall file a certificate of merger or consolidation in the office of the secretary of state, stating:

The name and jurisdiction of formation or organization of each of the domestic limited partnerships or other business entities that is to merge or consolidate;

That an agreement of merger or consolidation has been approved and executed by each of the domestic limited partnerships or other business entities that is to merge or consolidate;

The name of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity;

The future effective date or time, which shall be a date or time certain, of the merger or consolidation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger or consolidation;

That the agreement of merger or consolidation is on file at a place of business of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and shall state the address of that place of business;

That a copy of the agreement of merger or consolidation will be furnished by the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, on request and without cost, to any partner of any domestic limited partnership or any person holding an interest in any other business entity that is to merge or consolidate; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not a domestic limited partnership or corporation organized under the laws of Rhode Island, a statement that the surviving or resulting other business entity agrees that it may be served with process in Rhode Island in any action, suit or proceeding for the enforcement of any obligation of any domestic limited partnership that is to merge or consolidate, irrevocably appointing the secretary of state as its agent to accept service of process in the action, suit or proceeding and specifying the address to which a copy of the process is to be mailed to it by the secretary of state. In the event of service under this section on the secretary of state, the procedures set forth in §

7-1.2-503

are applicable, except that the plaintiff in any action, suit or proceeding shall furnish the secretary of state with the address specified in the certificate of merger or consolidation provided for in this section and any other address that the plaintiff elects to furnish, together with copies of the process as required by the secretary of state, and the secretary of state shall notify the surviving or resulting other business entity at all addresses furnished by the plaintiff in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

7-1.2-503

.

Any failure to file a certificate of merger or consolidation in connection with a merger or consolidation pursuant to this section that was effective prior to the effective date of this section does not affect the validity or effectiveness of the merger or consolidation.

Unless a future effective date or time is provided in a certificate of merger or consolidation, in which event a merger or consolidation is effective at that future effective date or time, a merger or consolidation is effective upon the filing in the office of the secretary of state of a certificate of merger or consolidation.

A certificate of merger or consolidation acts as a certificate of cancellation for a domestic limited partnership that is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger or consolidation.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in a partnership agreement, a partnership agreement containing a specific reference to this subsection may provide that an agreement of merger or consolidation approved in accordance with subsection (b) may:

Effect any amendment to the partnership agreement; or

Effect the adoption of a new partnership agreement for a limited partnership if it is the surviving or resulting limited partnership in the merger or consolidation.

Any amendment to a partnership agreement or adoption of a new partnership agreement made pursuant to the preceding sentence is effective at the effective time or date of the merger or consolidation. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the accomplishment of a merger or of any of the matters referred to in this section by any other means provided for in a partnership agreement or other agreement or as otherwise permitted by law, including that the partnership agreement of any constituent limited partnership to the merger or consolidation (including a limited partnership formed for the purpose of consummating a merger or consolidation) is the partnership agreement of the surviving or resulting limited partnership.

When any merger or consolidation has become effective under this section, for all purposes of the laws of the state of Rhode Island, all of the rights, privileges and powers of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged or consolidated, and all property, real, personal, and mixed, and all debts due to any of those domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, as well as all other things and causes of action belonging to each of those domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, are vested in the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and are subsequently the property of the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity as they were of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged or consolidated. The title to any real property vested by deed or otherwise, under the laws of the state of Rhode Island, in any of those domestic limited partnerships and other business entities, does not revert or in any way become impaired because of this chapter; but all rights of creditors and all liens upon any property of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities are preserved unimpaired, and all debts, liabilities and duties of each of the domestic limited partnerships and other business entities that have merged or consolidated subsequently attach to the surviving or resulting domestic limited partnership or other business entity, and may be enforced against it to the same extent as if the debts, liabilities and duties had been incurred or contracted by it. Unless otherwise agreed, a merger or consolidation of a domestic limited partnership, including a domestic limited partnership that is not the surviving or resulting entity in the merger or consolidation, does not require the domestic limited partnership to wind up its affairs under §

7-13-46

or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets under §

7-13-47

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8.

7-13-68.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 227, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 188, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 8; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13-69.
Filing of returns with the tax administrator — Annual charge. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, a limited partnership certified under this chapter shall file a return, in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator, as follows:

If the fiscal year of the limited partnership is the calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of April in the year following the close of the fiscal year; and

If the fiscal year of the limited partnership is not a calendar year, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year.

For tax years beginning after December 31, 2015, a limited partnership certified under this chapter shall file a return, in the form and containing the information as prescribed by the tax administrator, and shall be filed on or before the date a federal tax return is due to be filed, without regard to extension.

An annual charge, equal to the minimum tax imposed upon a corporation under §

44-11-2(e)

, shall be due on the filing of the limited partnership’s return filed with the tax administrator and shall be paid to the division of taxation.

The annual charge is delinquent if not paid by the due date for the filing of the return and an addition of one hundred dollars ($100) to the charge is then due.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 5.

7-13-69.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 13, § 5; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.